Idaho, session 2025, H0102.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 31-4320, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-4320. DISSOLUTION OF DISTRICT -- PROCEDURE. A recreation district
may be dissolved as follows:
(a) Any person or persons may file a petition for the dissolution of a
recreation district with the clerk. Such petition, which may be in one (1) or
more papers, shall state the name of the district and shall be signed by not
less than twenty per cent percent (20%) of the qualified electors resident
within the boundaries of the district. Alternatively, if the number of qual-
ified electors resident within the boundaries of the district has increased
by more than two hundred percent (200%) since the creation of the recreation
district, then a majority of the board of directors of the recreation dis-
trict may file a petition for the dissolution of the recreation district with
the clerk. Such petition shall state the name of the district but shall not
require any signatures of the qualified electors resident within the bound-
aries of the district.
(b) Within thirty (30) days after the filing of such petition, the
county commissioners shall determine whether or not the same substantially
complies with the requirements of this section. If the county commissioners
find that there has not been substantial compliance with such requirements,
they shall enter an order to that effect specifying the particular deficien-
cies and dismissing the petition. If the county commissioners find that
there has been substantial compliance with such requirements, the county
commissioners shall forthwith timely enter an order to that effect and
calling call an election, subject to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho
Code, upon on the dissolution of such district as provided in this section.
(c) If the county commissioners order an election as provided in this
section, such election shall be conducted and notice thereof given in accor-
dance with the provisions of section 31-4304, Idaho Code.
(d) Immediately after such election, the judges at such election shall
forward the ballots and results of such election to the clerk. The county
commissioners shall canvass the vote within ten (10) days after such elec-
tion. If one-half (1/2) or more of the votes cast at such election are
against the dissolution of such district, the county commissioners shall
enter an order so finding and declaring that such district shall not be dis-
solved. If more than one-half (1/2) of the votes cast at such election are


in favor of dissolving such district, the county commissioners shall enter
an order so finding and declaring such district duly dissolved. The county
commissioners shall cause one (1) certified copy of such order to be filed in
the office of the county recorder of such county. Immediately upon the entry
of such order, the dissolution of such district shall be complete.
(e) Upon such dissolution being complete, title to all property of the
dissolved district shall vest in the county where such property is situated.
The county commissioners shall then: sell and dispose thereof in the man-
ner provided by law for the sale or disposition of county property; apply the
proceeds thereof to pay any lawful claims against the dissolved district, if
any; and apply the balance remaining, if any, to any public recreation pur-
poses within the county.
(f) When the boundaries of the district lie in two (2) or more counties,
the county commissioners of each county shall act separately in the elec-
tion and dissolution of that part of the district contained in their county
but the county commissioners of each such county shall meet together before
calling such election and provide for uniform proceedings in each county. If
there is any balance remaining after sale and disposition of the property of
such dissolved district, it shall be prorated among such counties in propor-
tion to each county's share of the total assessed valuation of such dissolved
district for the preceding calendar year.
(g) After such election, the validity of the proceedings hereunder
shall not be affected by any defect in the petition or in the number or
qualifications of the signers thereof, and in no event shall any action be
commenced or maintained or defense made affecting the validity of the dis-
solution of such district after six (6) months has expired from the date of
entering the order declaring the dissolution of such district.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.